Tennessee, session 114, SB0978.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-1205, is amended by deleting
"adult day care" wherever it appears in subdivision (5) and substituting instead "adult day
services".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1802, is amended by deleting
"adult day care" in subdivision (9) and substituting instead "adult day services".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1803, is amended by deleting
"adult day care" in subdivision (a)(3) and substituting instead "adult day services".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 52-8-203, is amended by deleting
"adult day care" wherever it appears in subdivision (a)(5) and substituting instead "adult day
services".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-1-105, is amended by deleting
"adult day care" in subdivision (a)(5)(A) and substituting instead "adult day services" and
deleting "adult day care services" in subdivision (a)(5)(C) and substituting instead "adult day
services".
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-2-401, is amended by deleting
"Adult day care" wherever it appears and substituting instead "Adult day services" and by
deleting "adult day care services" wherever it appears and substituting instead "adult day
services".
SB0978
001602
- 1 -

SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 71, Chapter 2, Part 4, is amended by
deleting "adult day care" wherever it appears in Sections 71-2-402 – 71-2-407, Sections 71-2-
409 – 71-2-412, and Section 71-2-416 and substituting instead "adult day services".
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-3-515, is amended by deleting
"adult day care" in subsection (a) and substituting instead "adult day services".
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-1402, is amended by deleting
"adult daycare" in subsection (e) and substituting instead "adult day services".
SECTION 10. The code commission is requested to delete "adult day care" in the
headings in any compilation or publication containing Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 71,
Chapter 2, Part 4 and to substitute "adult day services".
SECTION 11. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001602